Florida, session 2026, HB1521.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
64
65 Section 1. Section 585.701, Florida Statutes, is created
66 to read:
67 585.701 Dog breeders; best management practices.—
68 (1) The Legislature finds that the safe and ethical
69 breeding of dogs in this state is a matter of great public
70 importance and that breeding dogs for profit without regard for
71 the condition in which the dogs live or how they are cared for
72 is an act of animal cruelty. Therefore, the Legislature intends
73 to ensure that dog breeding is done in an ethical manner by
74 establishing best management practices to ensure the humane
75 treatment of animals.
Page 3 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
76 (2) As used in this section, the term:
77 (a) "Board" means the Board of Veterinary Medicine.
78 (b) "Breeding female dog" means a dog that has not been
79 spayed and is more than 6 months old and capable of
80 reproduction.
81 (c) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and
82 Consumer Services.
83 (d) "Dog breeder" means a person who owns or possesses
84 breeding female dogs and offers for sale more than two litters
85 of dogs per calendar year.
86 (e) "Dog breeding facility" means a location that is the
87 site of a dog breeder which houses five or more breeding female
88 dogs.
89 (f) "Hobby breeder" means a person who owns or possesses
90 breeding female dogs and offers for sale one litter per calendar
91 year.
92 (g) "Litter" means the collection of dogs birthed, whether
93 naturally or from cesarean section, from a breeding female dog
94 from the same pregnancy.
95 (h) "Veterinary care" means examinations, vaccinations,
96 treatment, and preventive care provided by a veterinarian
97 licensed in this state.
98 (3) The department shall:
99 (a) Develop and adopt by rule pursuant to ss. 120.536(1)
100 and 120.54 best management practices or other measures necessary
Page 4 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
101 to improve the practices of dog breeders and dog breeding
102 facilities in a way that protects this state's domestic animal
103 resources and that preserves a viable and ethical dog breeding
104 industry. In developing the rule, the department shall consider,
105 at a minimum, the spacing of and sanitation guidelines for cages
106 and pens, requiring adequate access to clean water, limiting the
107 number of times a breeding female dog may be bred per year, and
108 providing breeding female dogs and their litters with
109 appropriate shelter.
110 (b) Before adopting the rule required by paragraph (a),
111 submit the proposed rule to the board. The board shall verify
112 that the proposed best management practices, and other measures
113 developed by the department, will be reasonably effective in
114 achieving the goals of this section. The board shall notify the
115 department of its initial verification.
116 (4) This section may not be construed to prohibit a local
117 jurisdiction from implementing requirements for dog breeders or
118 dog breeding facilities which are stricter than those in this
119 section or any rule adopted by the department.
120 Section 2. Section 828.265, Florida Statutes, is created
121 to read:
122 828.265 Regulation of animal shelters.—
123 (1) The Legislature finds that a lack of resources,
124 training, and consistent enforcement of rules at the local level
125 has resulted in an undermining of the public trust of, and a
Page 5 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
126 failure to protect vulnerable animals housed in, local animal
127 shelters. Therefore, the Legislature intends to provide
128 statewide oversight of local animal shelters to ensure
129 consistent implementation and enforcement of rules governing
130 local animal shelters.
131 (2) As used in this section, the term:
132 (a) "Department" means the Department of Agriculture and
133 Consumer Services.
134 (b) "Local animal shelter" includes city and county animal
135 rescues and animal shelters.
136 (3) The regulatory and operational oversight of local
137 animal shelters is preempted to the department.
138 (4) The department shall adopt rules governing all of the
139 following:
140 (a) Basic standards for the care of animals housed in
141 local animal shelters, including providing adequate food, water,
142 shelter, and medical treatment.
143 (b) Mandatory reporting requirements for local animal
144 shelters to report intake, adoption, and euthanasia statistics
145 in a standardized format.
146 (c) Guidelines for the safe and humane euthanasia of
147 animals.
148 (d) Periodic inspections of local animal shelters.
149 (5) The department is encouraged to collaborate with
150 reputable nonprofit and private organizations to manage animal
Page 6 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
151 shelters.
152 Section 3. Subsections (5) through (8), (10), (12), and
153 (17) of section 828.29, Florida Statutes, are amended, and
154 subsections (18) through (21) are added to that section, to
155 read:
156 828.29 Dogs and cats transported or offered for sale;
157 health requirements; consumer guarantee; disclosures.—
158 (5) If, within 14 days after following the sale by a pet
159 dealer of an animal subject to this section, a licensed
160 veterinarian of the consumer's choosing certifies that, at the
161 time of the sale, the animal was unfit for purchase due to
162 illness or disease, the presence of symptoms of a contagious or
163 infectious disease, or the presence of internal or external
164 parasites, excluding fleas and ticks; or if, within 1 year after
165 following the sale of an animal subject to this section, a
166 licensed veterinarian of the consumer's choosing certifies such
167 animal to be unfit for purchase due to a congenital or
168 hereditary disorder which adversely affects the health of the
169 animal; or if, within 1 year after following the sale of an
170 animal subject to this section, the breed, sex, or health of
171 such animal is found to have been misrepresented to the
172 consumer, the pet dealer shall afford the consumer the right to
173 choose one of the following options:
174 (a) The right to return the animal and receive a refund of
175 the purchase price, including the sales tax, and reimbursement
Page 7 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
176 for reasonable veterinary costs directly related to the
177 veterinarian's examination and certification that the dog or cat
178 is unfit for purchase pursuant to this section and directly
179 related to necessary emergency services and treatment undertaken
180 to relieve suffering. If the consumer financed the animal, the
181 pet dealer must ensure that the financing arrangement is
182 terminated without penalty to the consumer;
183 (b) The right to return the animal and receive an exchange
184 dog or cat of the consumer's choice of equivalent value, and
185 reimbursement for reasonable veterinary costs directly related
186 to the veterinarian's examination and certification that the dog
187 or cat is unfit for purchase pursuant to this section and
188 directly related to necessary emergency services and treatment
189 undertaken to relieve suffering; or
190 (c) The right to retain the animal and receive
191 reimbursement for reasonable veterinary costs for necessary
192 services and treatment related to the attempt to cure or curing
193 of the dog or cat.
194
195 Reimbursement for veterinary costs may not exceed the purchase
196 price of the animal. The cost of veterinary services is
197 reasonable if comparable to the cost of similar services
198 rendered by other licensed veterinarians in proximity to the
199 treating veterinarian and the services rendered are appropriate
200 for the certification by the veterinarian.
Page 8 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
201 (6) All financing terms must be disclosed to the consumer
202 before the sale of the animal. A mandatory waiting period of at
203 least 3 calendar days must be imposed between the date of an
204 agreement to purchase an animal and the date on which the
205 consumer takes possession of the animal, if the consumer is
206 financing the animal. A financing agreement may not be signed by
207 the consumer until the conclusion of the 3-day waiting period A
208 consumer may sign a waiver relinquishing his or her right to
209 return the dog or cat for congenital or hereditary disorders. In
210 the case of such waiver, the consumer has 48 normal business
211 hours, excluding weekends and holidays, in which to have the
212 animal examined by a licensed veterinarian of the consumer's
213 choosing. If the veterinarian certifies that, at the time of
214 sale, the dog or cat was unfit for purchase due to a congenital
215 or hereditary disorder, the pet dealer must afford the consumer
216 the right to choose one of the following options:
217 (a) The right to return the animal and receive a refund of
218 the purchase price, including sales tax, but excluding the
219 veterinary costs related to the certification that the dog or
220 cat is unfit; or
221 (b) The right to return the animal and receive an exchange
222 dog or cat of the consumer's choice of equivalent value, but not
223 a refund of the veterinary costs related to the certification
224 that the dog or cat is unfit.
225 (7) Before the sale of an animal, a pet dealer must
Page 9 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
226 provide to the consumer copies of records of all medical
227 examinations or tests that were conducted on the animal or any
228 medication given before the purchase of the animal. A pet dealer
229 may specifically state at the time of sale, in writing to the
230 consumer, the presence of specific congenital or hereditary
231 disorders, in which case the consumer has no right to any refund
232 or exchange for those disorders.
233 (8) The refund or exchange required by subsection (5) must
234 or subsection (6) shall be made by the pet dealer not later than
235 10 business days after following receipt of a signed veterinary
236 certification as required in subsection (5) or subsection (6).
237 The consumer must notify the pet dealer within 2 business days
238 after the veterinarian's determination that the animal is unfit.
239 The written certification of unfitness must be presented to the
240 pet dealer not later than 3 business days after following
241 receipt thereof by the consumer.
242 (10) If a pet dealer wishes to contest a demand for
243 veterinary expenses, refund, or exchange made by a consumer
244 under this section, the dealer may require the consumer to
245 produce the animal for examination by a licensed veterinarian
246 designated by the dealer. Upon such examination, if the consumer
247 and the dealer are unable to reach an agreement that constitutes
248 one of the options set forth in subsection (5) or subsection (6)
249 within 10 business days after following receipt of the animal
250 for such examination, the consumer may initiate an action in a
Page 10 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
251 court of competent jurisdiction to recover or obtain
252 reimbursement of veterinary expenses, refund, or exchange.
253 (12) Every pet dealer who sells an animal to a consumer
254 shall must provide the consumer at the time of sale with a
255 printed, written notice. The pet dealer shall retain a copy of
256 the signed notice, and the consumer must be given a copy of the
257 signed notice. The notice, printed or typed, which is separate
258 from the contract, shall read reads as follows:
259
260 RIGHT TO CANCEL
261 Florida consumers have certain rights under s. 828.29,
262 Florida Statutes. You have the right to return or
263 exchange a dog or cat purchased from a pet dealer and
264 receive reimbursement for certain veterinary expenses.
265 A copy of this law is attached to this notice.
266
267 ...(Signature of Owner, or Owner's or Authorized
268 Agent)...
269
270 Sworn to (or affirmed) and subscribed before me this
271 .... day of ...., ...., by ...(name of person making
272 statement)....
273
274 It is the consumer's right, pursuant to section
275 828.29, Florida Statutes, to receive a certificate of
Page 11 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
276 veterinary inspection with each dog or cat purchased
277 from a pet dealer. Such certificate shall list all
278 vaccines and deworming medications administered to the
279 animal and shall state that the animal has been
280 examined by a Florida-licensed veterinarian who
281 certifies that, to the best of the veterinarian's
282 knowledge, the animal was found to have been healthy
283 at the time of the veterinary examination. In the
284 event that the consumer purchases the animal and finds
285 it to have been unfit for purchase as provided in
286 section 828.29(5), Florida Statutes, the consumer must
287 notify the pet dealer within 2 business days of the
288 veterinarian's determination that the animal was
289 unfit. The consumer has the right to retain, return,
290 or exchange the animal and receive reimbursement for
291 certain related veterinary services rendered to the
292 animal, subject to the right of the dealer to have the
293 animal examined by another veterinarian.
294
295 (17) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a
296 person who violates any provision of this section commits a
297 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s.
298 775.082 or s. 775.083.
299 (18) A pet dealer shall retain any record provided to a
300 consumer pursuant to the sale of an animal under this section
Page 12 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
301 for at least 7 years after the sale.
302 (19) A retail store that offers animals for sale shall:
303 (a) Provide the city or county animal rescue or animal
304 shelter the opportunity to temporarily house fostered animals
305 during the day on weekdays, if the facility is deemed capable to
306 do so, in order to provide foster dogs with exposure to
307 potential owners and provide a day care opportunity to
308 individuals who foster dogs.
309 (b) Ensure the dog breeder or dog breeding facility from
310 which the store has acquired a dog meets the best management
311 practices adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer
312 Services pursuant to s. 585.701.
313 (20) A pet dealer who violates this section commits an
314 unfair method of competition or an unfair or deceptive act or
315 practice in violation of part II of chapter 501 and is subject
316 to the penalties and remedies provided for such violations.
317 (21) In addition to any other penalties or remedies
318 provided by law, a consumer injured by a violation of this
319 section may bring a civil action to recover damages or punitive
320 damages, including court costs, attorney fees, and related
321 expenses. This section does not limit any right or remedy
322 provided under law.
323 Section 4. Section 828.291, Florida Statutes, is created
324 to read:
325 828.291 Dog breeder certificate of registration.—
Page 13 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
326 (1) As used in this section, the term:
327 (a) "Breeding female dog" means a dog that has not been
328 spayed and is more than 6 months old and capable of
329 reproduction.
330 (b) "Department" means the Department of Business and
331 Professional Regulation.
332 (c) "Dog breeder" means a person who owns or possesses
333 breeding female dogs and offers for sale more than two litters
334 of dogs per calendar year.
335 (d) "Dog breeding facility" means a location that is the
336 site of a dog breeder which houses five or more breeding female
337 dogs.
338 (e) "Litter" means the collection of dogs birthed, whether
339 naturally or from cesarean section, from a breeding female dog
340 from the same pregnancy.
341 (2) Each dog breeder in this state must apply to the
342 department, on forms supplied by the department, for a
343 certificate of registration. The certificate of registration
344 must be renewed every 2 years thereafter. To be eligible to
345 receive a certificate of registration, a dog breeder must submit
346 documentation to the department that the breeder meets the best
347 management practices adopted by the Department of Agriculture
348 and Consumer Services pursuant to s. 585.701.
349 (3) If the department is notified that a certified dog
350 breeder is not in compliance with the best management practices
Page 14 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
351 adopted by the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services
352 pursuant to s. 585.701, the department may investigate such
353 claim. The department may establish a whistleblower program
354 through which any individual may alert the department or its
355 contracted authority about a violation of s. 585.701. The
356 department may contract with a private entity to administer the
357 whistleblower program. If a private entity is contracted to
358 receive calls, the private entity must provide monthly reports
359 to the department detailing the number of calls received, the
360 number of calls referred to law enforcement, and the status of
361 each case referred to law enforcement.
362 (4) Any individual, dog breeder, or dog breeding facility
363 that is found to employ any of the following practices or
364 conditions is subject to penalties under s. 828.073 or s.
365 828.12; the individual, dog breeder, or dog breeding facility
366 must be placed on the Department of Law Enforcement's website
367 pursuant to s. 828.12(7); and the department shall provide all
368 applicable information to law enforcement to pursue criminal
369 charges:
370 (a) Overcrowding of dogs crammed into cages or pens with
371 no space to move.
372 (b) Enclosures with significant build-up of feces, urine,
373 and waste.
374 (c) Dogs exhibiting untreated infections or parasites due
375 to unsanitary conditions.
Page 15 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
376 (d) Limited or no access to clean water.
377 (e) Breeding a female dog more than 2 times per year.
378 (f) Exposing breeding females and their litters to extreme
379 temperatures without appropriate shelter.
380 Section 5. Best management practices for dog breeding.—
381 (1) The purpose of this section is to provide best
382 management practices for minimum standards of care, facility
383 operations, and breeding practices for individuals or entities
384 engaged in the breeding of dogs in order to protect animal
385 welfare, promote responsible breeding, and ensure the health and
386 safety of animals and consumers. The Department of Agriculture
387 and Consumer Services shall use these best management practices
388 as baseline requirements for breeder permitting, inspection, and
389 oversight in this state when developing rules to implement this
390 section.
391 (2) All dog breeding facilities in this state must:
392 (a) Provide animals with clean, safe, temperature-
393 controlled housing.
394 (b) Provide a space for each dog that, at a minimum:
395 1. Allows the dog to stand, turn, lie down, and move
396 freely.
397 2. Is not a stacked primary enclosure.
398 (c) Provide separate areas for whelping and sick or
399 quarantined animals.
400 (d) Store food in sealed, rodent-proof containers.
Page 16 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
401 (e) Clean kennels daily and disinfect kennels regularly.
402 (f) Remove waste in a manner that minimizes odors,
403 insects, and contamination of living areas.
404 (g) Clean and sanitize food and water bowls daily.
405 (h) Provide daily socialization appropriate to the age and
406 temperament of each dog.
407 (i) Provide access to exercise outside the primary
408 enclosure at least twice each day.
409 (j) Provide toys, bedding, and sensory enrichment unless
410 medically contraindicated.
411 (k) Provide continuous access to clean, potable water.
412 (l) Provide a diet appropriate for the age, breed, and
413 condition of each dog in accordance with veterinary
414 recommendations.
415 (3) All dog breeders must:
416 (a) Maintain a written veterinary care plan signed
417 annually by a veterinarian licensed in this state.
418 (b) Ensure that every dog receives:
419 1. Annual physical examinations.
420 2. Core vaccinations.
421 3. Regular heartworm and parasite prevention.
422 (c) Maintain detailed veterinary records for each dog.
423 (d) Provide immediate veterinary attention for any sign of
424 illness, injury, or distress.
425 (e) Ensure all whelping female dogs receive prenatal and
Page 17 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
426 postpartum care.
427 (f) Provide an agreement that the breeder and pet store
428 must sign with an independent consulting veterinarian.
429 (4)(a) A female dog may not be bred before 18 months of
430 age or for more than two litters within any 12-month period.
431 (b) Female dogs must be given adequate recovery time
432 between litters based on veterinary guidance.
433 (c) Genetic screening must be performed for breed-specific
434 inherited disorders when such tests are available.
435 (d) Breeding dogs demonstrating severe hereditary defects
436 must be retired from breeding.
437 (e) Artificial insemination may only occur under
438 veterinary supervision.
439 (5)(a) Breeders must maintain accurate records onsite for
440 at least 7 years which include all of the following information
441 for each dog:
442 1. Identification of each dog by a microchip.
443 2. Birthdates, parentage, litter sizes, and breeding
444 dates.
445 3. Veterinary records, vaccinations, and treatments.
446 4. Sales or transfers, including buyer information.
447 5. Mortality records with cause, if known.
448 (b) The records must be available for inspection upon
449 request.
450 (6)(a) A dog may not be sold or transferred before 8 weeks
Page 18 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
451 of age. Every dog must have:
452 1. A veterinary health certificate.
453 2. Age-appropriate vaccinations.
454 3. A microchip registered to the breeder until the buyer
455 assumes ownership.
456 (b) Breeders must provide buyers with:
457 1. A written contract.
458 2. Disclosure of any known hereditary conditions.
459 3. Instructions for care, feeding, and veterinary
460 followup.
461 (7) Breeders shall be subject to annual inspections and
462 complaint-based inspections. Inspectors must be granted access
463 to all areas in which dogs are housed or cared for.
464 (8) Violations may result in written warnings, fines,
465 permit suspension or revocation, or, in cases of imminent danger
466 or cruelty, the seizure of animals.
467 (9) The following acts are prohibited:
468 (a) Operating a breeding operation without proper
469 registration. If applicable, a United States Department of
470 Agriculture permit shall be required.
471 (b) Failure to provide dogs with adequate veterinary care,
472 nutrition, sanitation, or space.
473 (c) Falsifying records relating to dog breeding.
474 (d) Transporting puppies younger than 8 weeks of age,
475 except for veterinary care.
Page 19 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1521 2026
476 (e) Selling dogs obtained from unlicensed breeders or
477 breeders who are not in compliance with applicable laws.
478 (f) Selling dogs in parking lots, flea markets, or other
479 temporary venues.
480 (10)(a) Violations shall be classified as civil
481 infractions with escalating penalties.
482 (b) Repeat violations may be referred for prosecution
483 under applicable animal cruelty laws.
484 (c) Any fees collected for breeder permits must be used
485 exclusively for enforcement, inspections, animal care and
486 sheltering, and public education on responsible breeding.
487 Section 6. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 20 of 20
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1521-00